test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-62argnwma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `argnõma: # Verb (62) `argnõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     argnõma+V+Inf/mA: argnõma
     argnõma+V+Inf: arõdaq
     argnõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: arõnuq
     argnõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [arõt, arõtu]

     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: argnõ
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [argnõt, argnõdõq]
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: argnõs
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: argnõmiq
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: argnõtiq
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: argnõsõq
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: argnõ
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: argsi
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [argsit, argsiq, argsidõq]
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: arõsʼ
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: argsimiq
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: argsitiq
     argnõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [argsiq, argsivaq]

     argnõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arõtas

     argnõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: argnõv

     argnõma+V+Jus: arõkuq
